Indiana, session 2026, HB1425.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 6-3.1-42.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW CHAPTER TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2027]:
Chapter 42.5. Social Service Provider Tax Credit
Sec. 1. This chapter applies only to taxable years beginning after
December 31, 2026.
Sec. 2. As used in this chapter, "credit" refers to the social
service provider tax credit allowable under this chapter.
Sec. 3. As used in this chapter, "designated contribution" means
a monetary contribution to a qualified nonprofit organization that
the contributor designates at the time of the contribution as being
made for the purpose of the credit.
Sec. 4. As used in this chapter, "pass through entity" has the
meaning set forth in IC 6-3-1-35.
Sec. 5. (a) As used in this chapter, "qualified nonprofit
organization" means a nonprofit organization that meets the
following conditions:
2026 IN 1425—LS 6678/DI 134


(1) Is exempt from federal income taxation under Section
501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code.
(2) Is authorized to conduct business in Indiana.
(3) Has provided any of the following services in Indiana for
at least ten (10) years preceding the organization's initial
application for eligibility:
(A) Comprehensive case management services for at risk
families based on the assessment of family strengths and
needs.
(B) Family support services.
(C) In-school programs, community based events, or online
resources to assist fathers in learning and improving
parenting skills.
(D) Programs that provide mutual support systems among
mothers in raising children or information for mothers to
enhance child development.
(4) Does not provide abortion services, either directly or
indirectly, or offer information related to such services.
(b) Services described in subsection (a)(3)(A) through (a)(3)(D)
must be implemented with a continuous quality improvement
process and evaluated based on outcomes.
Sec. 6. As used in this chapter, "state tax liability" means a
taxpayer's total tax liability that is incurred under:
(1) IC 6-3-1 through IC 6-3-7 (the adjusted gross income tax);
(2) IC 6-5.5 (the financial institutions tax); and
(3) IC 27-1-18-2 (the insurance premiums tax);
as computed after the application of the credits that under
IC 6-3.1-1-2 are to be applied before the credit provided by this
chapter.
Sec. 7. As used in this chapter, "taxpayer" means an individual
or entity that has any state tax liability.
Sec. 8. A taxpayer that makes a designated contribution that
meets the requirements of this chapter is eligible to apply for a
credit in the amount and under the conditions provided by this
chapter against the taxpayer's state tax liability.
Sec. 9. An organization or qualified nonprofit organization must
respectively apply or reapply for certification as a qualified
nonprofit organization each calendar year by submitting to the
department a signed application form containing:
(1) a description of the qualifying services and resources
provided by the organization;
(2) the total number of individuals served during the previous
2026 IN 1425—LS 6678/DI 134


calendar year and the number of those individuals who were
served and provided resources during that year using
designated contributions;
(3) outcomes for services provided;
(4) the organization's financial information;
(5) the organization's contact information;
(6) a statement, signed under penalty of perjury by an officer
of the organization, that the organization meets all criteria to
qualify as a qualified nonprofit organization, has fulfilled the
requirements for the previous calendar year (as applicable),
and intends to fulfill the requirements for the next calendar
year; and
(7) any other documentation requested by the department to
verify an organization's eligibility.
Sec. 10. The department shall do the following:
(1) Issue a certificate of eligibility to an eligible applicant
stating that the organization meets the qualifications of a
qualified nonprofit organization.
(2) Revoke an organization's certificate of eligibility if the
organization violates the provisions of this chapter or fails to
maintain the eligibility requirements of this chapter.
(3) Require the return of designated contributions made to an
organization that has had the organization's certification as
a qualified nonprofit organization revoked or that otherwise
fails to comply with the requirements of this chapter.
Sec. 11. An organization that is required to return designated
contributions under section 10(3) of this chapter is ineligible for
future qualification as a qualified nonprofit organization. An
organization whose certification as an eligible organization lapses
or is revoked for a reason other than the reason described in
section 10(2) of this chapter may reapply for certification as a
qualified nonprofit organization.
Sec. 12. A qualified nonprofit organization shall do the
following:
(1) Conduct a local, state, and national criminal background
check of all individuals working directly with children in a
program funded by designated contributions that includes the
use of:
(A) a commercial multi-state and multi-jurisdiction
criminal records locator or other similar commercial
nationwide data base; and
(B) the national sex offender registry data base maintained
2026 IN 1425—LS 6678/DI 134


by the United States Department of Justice or a successor
agency.
(2) Spend all designated contributions, other than the amount
described in subdivision (3), to provide services and resources
for Indiana residents.
(3) Spend not more than five percent (5%) of the total dollar
amount of designated contributions on administrative
expenses.
(4) Submit to the department, not later than one hundred
eighty (180) days after the end of the qualified nonprofit
organization's fiscal year:
(A) a copy of the qualified nonprofit organization's annual
financial audit; and
(B) a copy of the qualified nonprofit organization's most
recent federal Form 990 filed with the Internal Revenue
Service.
(5) Not later than thirty (30) days after receipt of a designated
contribution, provide to the taxpayer making the designated
contribution a certificate of designated contribution that
includes:
(A) the taxpayer's name;
(B) the qualified nonprofit organization's name;
(C) the amount of the designated contribution; and
(D) the date the designated contribution was made.
Sec. 13. Subject to the limitations provided by this chapter and
at the election of the taxpayer, a credit is allowed against the
taxpayer's state tax liability for the taxable year in which the
taxpayer makes a designated contribution to a qualified nonprofit
organization.
Sec. 14. Subject to section 15 of this chapter, the amount
allowable as a credit under this chapter for any taxable year is
equal to the lesser of:
(1) the total amount of the designated contributions made by
the taxpayer to one (1) or more qualified nonprofit
organizations; or
(2) fifty percent (50%) of the taxpayer's state tax liability.
Sec. 15. (a) A taxpayer may not apply for a credit in excess of
one million dollars ($1,000,000) during a taxable year.
(b) The total amount of credits awarded under this chapter may
not exceed five million dollars ($5,000,000) during a state fiscal
year. Any credits under this chapter are granted on a first-come,
first-served basis.
2026 IN 1425—LS 6678/DI 134


Sec. 16. (a) If the credit provided by this chapter exceeds the
taxpayer's state tax liability for the taxable year for which the
credit is first claimed, the excess may be carried forward to
succeeding taxable years and used as a credit against the
taxpayer's state tax liability during those taxable years. Each time
the credit is carried forward to a succeeding taxable year, the
credit is reduced by the amount that was used as a credit during
the immediately preceding taxable year.
(b) A taxpayer is not entitled to a carryback or refund of any
unused credit.
Sec. 17. If a pass through entity is entitled to a credit under this
chapter but does not have state tax liability against which the
credit may be applied, a shareholder, partner, or member of the
pass through entity is entitled to a credit equal to:
(1) the credit determined for the pass through entity for the
taxable year; multiplied by
(2) the percentage of the pass through entity's distributive
income to which the shareholder, partner, or member is
entitled.
Sec. 18. A taxable entity may not convey, assign, or transfer a
credit awarded under this chapter to another taxable entity unless
substantially all of the assets of the taxable entity are conveyed,
assigned, or transferred in the same transaction.
Sec. 19. (a) To apply a credit against the taxpayer's state tax
liability, a taxpayer must claim the credit on the taxpayer's annual
state tax return or returns in the manner prescribed by the
department.
(b) The taxpayer shall submit to the department the information
that the department determines is necessary for the department to
determine whether the taxpayer is eligible for the credit.
(c) The department shall notify a taxpayer in writing of the
department's decision to grant or deny the application. If the
department denies a taxpayer's application, the department shall
include in the notice of denial the reasons for the department's
decision.
Sec. 20. The department shall publish on the department's
website the following information:
(1) The form the department prescribes for claiming the
credit provided by this chapter.
(2) A timeline for receiving the credit provided by this
chapter.
(3) The total amount of credits awarded under this chapter
2026 IN 1425—LS 6678/DI 134


during the current state fiscal year.
(4) The requirements and process for an organization to be
certified as a qualified nonprofit organization.
(5) A list of organizations currently certified as qualified
nonprofit organizations.
Sec. 21. The expiration of this chapter does not affect the
carryforward of a credit under this chapter or those credits for
which a taxable entity is eligible after the date this chapter expires
based on designated contributions made before that date.
Sec. 22. This chapter expires January 1, 2036.
2026 IN 1425—LS 6678/DI 134